Washington statutes.
RCW 31.12.625

Administrative hearing—Procedures.

An administrative hearing on the notice provided for in RCW 31.12.575 and 31.12.585 must be conducted in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, and may be conducted by the director or the director's designee. To the extent the requirements of this chapter are inconsistent with chapter 34.05 RCW, this chapter will govern. The hearing may be held at such place as is designated by the director. The hearing shall be private unless the director determines that a public hearing is necessary to protect the public interest after fully considering the views of the party afforded the hearing.

[ 2010 c 87 s 11; 2001 c 83 s 35; 1997 c 397 s 56; 1994 c 92 s 214; 1984 c 31 s 64.]